test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-koira_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - koira: # Noun 'dog'
     koira+N+Sg+Nom: koira
     koira+N+Sg+Gen: koiran
     koira+N+Sg+Acc: koiran
     koira+N+Sg+Part: koiraa
     koira+N+Sg+Ill: koiraa
     koira+N+Sg+Ine: koiraas
     koira+N+Sg+Ela: koirast
     koira+N+Sg+All: koiralle
     koira+N+Sg+Ade: koiraal
     koira+N+Sg+Abl: koiralt
     koira+N+Sg+Tra: koiraks
     koira+N+Sg+Ess: koiranna
     koira+N+Sg+Exe: koirant

     koira+N+Pl+Nom: koirat
     koira+N+Pl+Gen: koiriin
     koira+N+Pl+Acc: koirat
     koira+N+Pl+Part: koiria
     koira+N+Pl+Ill: koirii
     koira+N+Pl+Ine: koiriis
     koira+N+Pl+Ela: koirist
     koira+N+Pl+All: koirille
     koira+N+Pl+Ade: koiriil
     koira+N+Pl+Abl: koirilt
     koira+N+Pl+Tra: koiriks
     koira+N+Pl+Ess: koirinna
     koira+N+Pl+Exe: koirint
